District of Columbia statutes.
34-1111

Commission to furnish blank forms.

The Commission shall cause to be prepared suitable blanks for carrying out the purposes of this subtitle, and shall when necessary furnish such blanks to each public utility.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 979, ch. 150, § 8, par. 12

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-511.
1973 Ed., § 43-311.